Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2256.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The order of the sunflower shall be awarded to military
spouses who have served their communities with distinction.
(b) The award recipient shall have been deemed to have made a
significant impact on their unity command, military installation,
community or the state of Kansas.
(c) The governor shall award the order of the sunflower based upon
submissions made to the governor's office through constituent services on
the governor's website. Award recommendations shall provide the dates of
service, significant accomplishments and recommendations from the unit
command.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.